Maryland, session 2026, SB0968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–808.
(a) In this section, “school bus” has the meaning stated in § 11–153 of the
Transportation Article.
(b) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A school bus shall be constructed with materials that enable it to meet all
the criteria of the school bus seat upholstery fire block test established by the National
School Transportation specifications and procedures adopted at the most recent National
Congress on School Transportation.
(2) THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DO
NOT APPLY TO THE DRIVER’S SEAT OF A SCHOOL BUS.
(c)] The Motor Vehicle Administration, with the advice of the Department, shall
adopt regulations to promote fire safety standards of school buses.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 1 –